District of Columbia statutes.
20-735

Optional proceedings, terminating unsupervised administration; testate or intestate; Certificate of Completion.

(a)

Unless otherwise ordered by the Court for good cause shown in a particular matter, the personal representative in an unsupervised administration shall close the estate by filing with the Court a Certificate of Completion, which shall be verified and in a form prescribed by the Court. Such Certificate may be filed at any time, but in no event prior to the expiration of the time for filing creditors’ claims against the estate.

(b)

The Certificate of Completion shall include a statement that:

(1)

the time for the presentation of creditors’ claims has expired;

(2)

all interested persons have been sent a copy of an account and a notice of each one’s right to object within 60 days after such account was sent, and that all claims of that interested person against the personal representative shall be barred unless such an objection is made;

(3)

either each interested person has consented in writing to the account as stated, or there was no written objection within the 60-day period described above;

(4)

distribution has been made in accordance with such account;

(5)

all known claims of creditors which are not barred have been fully satisfied or otherwise settled or, if any claim remains undischarged, whether the personal representative has distributed the estate subject to possible liability with the agreement of the distributees or a detailed explanation of what other arrangements have been made to accommodate all such outstanding liabilities; and

(6)

the personal representative has satisfied all administration expenses and other obligations of the estate incurred or authorized by the personal representative, and has otherwise fully administered the estate.

(c)

The Certificate of Completion shall also contain a list containing the name and address of each recipient of the copy of the account and the corresponding notice, as well as a certificate of service confirming that each of those individuals or entities also received a copy of the Certificate of Completion.

(d)

Any interested person or other recipient of a copy of the account may object to the account by mailing or delivering to the personal representative or to the Court, within the 60-day period described above, a written statement of his or her objections to the account as stated.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(xx), 42 DCR 63
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 19(i), 44 DCR 1271
This section is referenced in § 20-736 and § 20-1301.
1981 Ed., § 20-735.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.